th: รูปแบบโครงสร้างคอมพิวเตอร์ดำน้ำ: ติดคอนโซล; แบบเกจ; รวมกับหน้ากาก; แบบนาฬิกา; ติดข้อมือ; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Nardymo kompiuterio formos faktorius: Tvirtinamas prie pulto; Matuoklio tipo; Integruotas į kaukę; Laikrodžio tipo; Tvirtinamas ant riešo; Kita
bg-BG: Форм фактор на компютъра за гмуркане: Монтиран на конзола; Тип манометър; Вграден в маската; Тип часовник; Монтиран на китката; Друго
pt-BR: Fator de forma do computador de mergulho: Montado no console; Estilo medidor; Integrado na máscara; Estilo relógio; Montado no pulso; Outro
ja: ダイブコンピューターのフォームファクター: コンソールマウント; ゲージスタイル; マスク内蔵; 腕時計スタイル; リストマウント; その他
tr: Dalış bilgisayarı form faktörü: Konsol monteli; Gösterge stili; Maske entegre; Saat stili; Bilek monteli; Diğer
hu: Búvárkomputer kialakítása: Konzolba szerelhető; Műszerfal stílusú; Maszkba integrált; Óra stílusú; Csuklóra rögzíthető; Egyéb
ko: 다이브 컴퓨터 폼 팩터: 콘솔 장착형; 게이지형; 마스크 통합형; 시계형; 손목 장착형; 기타
hr-HR: Oblik ronilačkog računala: Montaža na konzolu; Stil mjerača; Integrirano u masku; U obliku sata; Montaža na zglob; Ostalo
zh-CN: 潜水电脑外形尺寸: 控制台安装; 仪表盘样式; 面罩集成; 手表样式; 手腕安装; 其他
fr: Format de l’ordinateur de plongée: Montage sur console; Format manomètre; Intégré au masque; Format montre; Montage au poignet; Autre
ro-RO: Factor de formă al computerului de scufundări: Montat pe consolă; Tip manometru; Integrat în mască; Tip ceas; Montat pe încheietură; Altele
pt-PT: Fator de forma do computador de mergulho: Montado na consola; Estilo manómetro; Integrado na máscara; Estilo relógio; Montado no pulso; Outro
fi: Sukellustietokoneen muoto ja rakenne: Konsoliin asennettava; Mittarimalli; Maskiin integroitu; Kellomalli; Ranteeseen kiinnitettävä; Muu
zh-TW: 潛水電腦外型規格: 儀表板安裝; 儀表式; 面罩整合式; 手錶式; 腕戴式; 其他
el: Συντελεστής μορφής υπολογιστή κατάδυσης: Τοποθέτηση σε κονσόλα; Τύπου μετρητή; Ενσωματωμένο σε μάσκα; Τύπου ρολογιού; Τοποθέτηση στον καρπό; Άλλο
cs: Tvarový faktor potápěčského počítače: Na konzoli; Ve tvaru manometru; Integrované v masce; Ve tvaru hodinek; Na zápěstí; Ostatní
sk-SK: Typ vyhotovenia potápačského počítača: Na konzolu; V tvare meradla; Integrované do masky; V tvare hodiniek; Na zápästie; Iný
ru: Формфактор дайв-компьютера: Установка на консоль; В виде манометра; Встроенный в маску; В виде часов; Крепление на запястье; Другое
en: Dive computer form factor: Console mounted; Gauge style; Mask integrated; Watch style; Wrist mounted; Other
nb: Formfaktor for dykkecomputer: Konsollmontert; Målerstil; Maskeintegrert; Klokkestil; Håndleddsmontert; Annet
it: Fattore di forma del computer subacqueo: Montaggio su console; A manometro; Integrato nella maschera; A orologio; Da polso; Altro
da: Dykkercomputerens formfaktor: Konsolmonteret; Måler-stil; Maskeintegreret; Ur-stil; Håndledsmonteret; Anden
vi: Kiểu dáng máy tính lặn: Gắn trên bảng điều khiển; Kiểu đồng hồ đo; Tích hợp trên mặt nạ; Kiểu đồng hồ đeo tay; Đeo cổ tay; Khác
nl: Duikcomputer vormfactor: Op de console gemonteerd; Meterstijl; In masker geïntegreerd; Horlogestijl; Om de pols gemonteerd; Overig
de: Bauform des Tauchcomputers: Konsolenmontage; Instrumenten-Stil; Maskenintegriert; Uhren-Stil; Handgelenkmontage; Sonstige
sv: Dykdatorns formfaktor: Konsolmonterad; Instrumentmodell; Maskintegrerad; Klockmodell; Handledsmonterad; Övrigt
sl-SI: Oblika potapljaškega računalnika: Namestitev na konzolo; V obliki merilnika; Vgrajeno v masko; V obliki ure; Namestitev na zapestje; Drugo
es: Factor de forma de la computadora de buceo: Montaje de consola; Estilo manómetro; Integrado en la máscara; Estilo reloj; Montaje de muñeca; Otro
pl: Forma komputera nurkowego: Montowany na konsoli; W formie wskaźnika; Zintegrowany z maską; W formie zegarka; Montowany na nadgarstku; Inny